Nebraska, session 109, LB179.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 16-1005, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
16-1005 (1)(a)(i) Prior to October 1, 2025 (1) Until October 1, 2013, each
police officer shall contribute to the retirement system a sum equal to six
percent of his or her salary. Beginning October 1, 2013, until October 1, 2015,
each police officer shall contribute to the retirement system a sum equal to
six and one-half percent of his or her salary. Beginning October 1, 2015, each
police officer shall contribute to the retirement system a sum equal to seven
percent of his or her salary.
(ii) Beginning October 1, 2025, each police officer shall contribute to
the retirement system a sum equal to nine percent of his or her salary.
(b) Such payment under subdivision (a) of this subsection shall be made by
regular payroll deductions from the police officer's periodic salary and shall
be credited to his or her employee account on a monthly basis.
(c) Each such account shall also be credited with regular interest.
(2) Each city of the first class shall pick up the police officers'
contributions required by subsection (1) of this section, and the contributions
so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions in determining federal
tax treatment under the Internal Revenue Code, except that the city shall
continue to withhold federal income taxes based upon these contributions until
the Internal Revenue Service or the federal courts rule that, pursuant to
section 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, these contributions shall not be
included as gross income of the employee until such time as they are
distributed from the retirement system. The city shall pay these employee
contributions from the same source of funds which is used in paying earnings to
the employee. The city shall pick up these contributions by a salary deduction
either through a reduction in the cash salary of the employee or a combination
of a reduction in salary and offset against a future salary increase. A police
officer shall not be given an option to choose to receive the amount of the
required contribution in lieu of having such contribution paid directly to the
retirement system.
(3) Each police officer shall be entitled to make voluntary cash
contributions to the retirement system in an amount not to exceed the
contribution limitations established by the Internal Revenue Code. Voluntary
contributions shall be credited to the police officer's employee account and
shall thereafter be credited with regular interest. A police officer's
voluntary contribution shall become a part of the Police Officers Retirement
System Fund and shall be held, administered, invested, and distributed in the
same manner as any other employee contribution to the retirement system.
Sec. 2. Section 16-1027, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
16-1027 (1) At any time before the retirement date, the retiring
firefighter may elect to receive his or her pension benefit at retirement
either in the form of a straight life annuity or any optional form of annuity
benefit established by the retirement committee and provided under a purchased
annuity contract. Such optional annuity benefit shall be specified in the
funding medium for the retirement system and shall include a straight life
annuity with a guarantee of at least sixty monthly payments or an annuity
payable for the life of the retiring firefighter and, after the death of the
retiree, monthly payments, as elected by the retiring firefighter, of one
hundred percent, seventy-five percent, or fifty percent of the amount of
annuity payable to the retiring firefighter during his or her life, to the
beneficiary selected by the retiring firefighter at the time of the original
application for an annuity. For any firefighter whose retirement date is on or
after January 1, 1997, the optional benefit forms for the retirement system
shall include permitting such firefighter, upon retirement, to receive a
payment of his or her retirement value in the form of a single lump-sum payment
or in the form of one or more partial payments of such retirement value in an
amount and frequency elected by the firefighter a single lump-sum payment of
the firefighter's retirement value. For firefighters whose retirement date is
prior to January 1, 1997, a single lump-sum payment shall be available only if
the city has adopted such distribution option in the funding medium established
for the retirement system. The retiring firefighter may further elect to defer
the date of the first payment or lump-sum distribution to the first day of any
-1-

LB179 LB179
2025 2025
specified month prior to age seventy. In the event the retiring firefighter
elects to receive his or her pension benefit in the form of an annuity, the
amount of such annuity benefit shall be the amount provided by the annuity
contract purchased or otherwise provided by the firefighter's retirement value
as of the date of the first payment. Any such annuity contract purchased by the
retirement system may be distributed to the retiring firefighter. Upon the
payment of a lump sum or the distribution of a paid-up annuity contract, all
obligations of the retirement system to pay retirement benefits to the
firefighter and his or her beneficiaries shall terminate, without exception.
(2) For all firefighters employed on January 1, 1984, the amount of the
pension benefit at the retirement date shall not be less than the following
amounts:
(a) If retirement from the city occurs following age fifty-five with
twenty-one years of service with the city, fifty percent of regular pay;
(b) If retirement from the city occurs following age fifty but before age
fifty-five with at least twenty-one years of service with the city, such
firefighter shall receive the actuarial equivalent of the benefit which would
otherwise be provided at age fifty-five;
(c) If retirement from the city occurs on or after age fifty-five with
less than twenty-one years of service with the city, such firefighter shall
receive a pension of at least fifty percent of the salary he or she was
receiving at the time of retirement multiplied by the ratio of the years of
service to twenty-one;
(d) For terminations of employment from the city on or after September 9,
1993, if such termination of employment as a firefighter occurs before age
fifty-five but after completion of twenty-one years of service with the city,
such firefighter shall receive upon the attainment of age fifty-five a pension
benefit of fifty percent of regular pay;
(e) Unless an optional annuity benefit is selected by the retired
firefighter, at the death of any such retired firefighter the same rate of
pension as is provided for in this section shall be paid to the surviving
spouse of such deceased firefighter during such time as the surviving spouse
remains unmarried and, in case there is no surviving spouse, then the minor
children, if any, of such deceased firefighter shall equally share such pension
benefit during their minority, except that as soon as a child of such deceased
firefighter ceases to be a minor, such pension as to such child shall cease; or
(f) In the event a retired firefighter or his or her surviving
beneficiaries die before the aggregate amount of pension payments received by
the firefighter and his or her survivor beneficiaries, if any, equals the total
amount in the firefighter's employee account, at the time of the first benefit
payment the difference between the total amount in the employee's account and
the aggregate amount of pension payments received by the retired firefighter
and his or her surviving beneficiaries, if any, shall be paid in a single sum
to the firefighter's estate.
A firefighter entitled to a minimum pension benefit under this subsection
may elect to receive such pension benefit in any form permitted by subsection
(1) of this section, including a single lump-sum payment, if the firefighter
retires on or after January 1, 1997, or if the city has adopted a lump-sum
distribution option for firefighters retiring before January 1, 1997, in the
funding medium for the retirement system. If the minimum pension benefit is
paid in the form of an optional annuity benefit or a single lump-sum payment,
such benefit or payment shall be the actuarial equivalent of the annuity that
would otherwise be paid to the firefighter pursuant to this subsection.
If the firefighter chooses the single lump-sum payment option, the
firefighter may request that the actuarial equivalent be equal to the average
of the cost of two annuity contracts based on products available for purchase
in Nebraska, if the difference between the cost of the two annuity contracts
does not exceed five percent. Of the two annuity contracts used for comparison,
one shall be chosen by the firefighter and one shall be chosen by the city. If
the difference between the two annuity contracts exceeds five percent, the
retirement committee shall review the costs of the two annuity contracts and
make a recommendation to the city council as to the amount of the lump-sum
payment to be made to the firefighter. The city council shall, after a hearing,
determine the amount of the single lump-sum payment due the firefighter. The
annuity contracts used for comparison shall all use the same type of sex-
neutral basis benefit calculation.
(3) If the retirement value of a firefighter entitled to a minimum pension
benefit under subsection (2) of this section is not sufficient at the time of
the first payment to purchase or provide the required pension benefit, the city
shall utilize such funds as may be necessary from the unallocated employer
account of the retirement system to purchase or provide for the required
pension benefit.
(4) Any retiring firefighter whose pension benefit is less than twenty-
five dollars per month on the straight life annuity option shall be paid a
lump-sum settlement equal to the retirement value in lieu of annuity and shall
not be entitled to elect to receive annuity benefits.
Sec. 3. Sections 2 and 4 of this act become operative on October 1, 2025.
The other sections of this act become operative on their effective date.
Sec. 4. Original section 16-1027, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
Sec. 5. Original section 16-1005, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
-2-